Utah statutes.
70A-9a-619.   Transfer of record or legal title.
(1)  In this section, "transfer statement" means a record authenticated by a
secured party stating:
(a)  that the debtor has defaulted in connection with an obligation secured by
specified collateral;
(b)  that the secured party has exercised its post-default remedies with
respect to the collateral;
(c)  that, by reason of the exercise, a transferee has acquired the rights of
the debtor in the collateral; and
(d)  the name and mailing address of the secured party, debtor, and
transferee.
(2)  A transfer statement entitles the transferee to the transfer of record of
all rights of the debtor in the collateral specified in the statement in any
official filing, recording, registration, or certificate-of-title system
covering the collateral.  If a transfer statement is presented with the
applicable fee and request form to the official or office responsible for
maintaining the system, the official or office shall:
(a)  accept the transfer statement;
(b)  promptly amend its records to reflect the transfer; and
(c)  if applicable, issue a new appropriate certificate of title in the name
of the transferee.
(3)  A transfer of the record or legal title to collateral to a secured party
under Subsection (2) or otherwise is not of itself a disposition of collateral
under this chapter and does not of itself relieve the secured party of its
duties under this chapter.
